Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201286-518
Progress report.

By
November 15 of each even-numbered year, the Nebraska Information Technology
Commission shall submit a progress report to the Governor and Legislature. The report submitted to the Legislature
shall be submitted electronically.

Laws 1998, LB 924, § 8;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-1508;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 288;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 245.
July 19, 2012